District of Columbia statutes.
2-1411.02

Purpose.

The purpose of the Office is to secure an end to unlawful discrimination in employment, housing, public accommodations, and educational institutions for any reason other than that of individual merit. The Office shall seek to eradicate discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression (as defined in § 2-1401.02(12A)), familial status, family responsibilities, matriculation, political affiliation, physical disability, source of income, and place of residence or business.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 203, 46 DCR 6373
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 12, 53 DCR 6198
June 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-177, § 5, 55 DCR 3696

History

D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “disability” for “handicap”.
D.C. Law 17-177 substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity or expression (as defined in § 2-1401.02(12A))” for “sexual orientation”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90-day) addition of subchapter IV, see notes following § 2-1411.01.

Emergency Legislation